Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5540.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 2. As used in this act: (a) "Affiliated transmission company" means a person, partnership, corporation, association, or other legal entity, or its successors or assigns, which that has fully satisfied the requirements to join a regional transmission organization, as determined by the federal energy regulatory commission, is engaged in this state or proposes to be engaged in the transmission of electricity using facilities it owns, that were transferred to the entity by an electric utility that was engaged in the generation, transmission, and distribution of electricity in this state on December 31, 2000, and is not independent of an electric utility or an affiliate of the utility, generating or distributing electricity to retail customers in this state. (b) "Certificate" means a certificate of public convenience and necessity issued for a major transmission line under this act or issued for a transmission line under section 9. (c) "Commission" means the Michigan public service commission. (d) "Construction" means any substantial action taken on a route constituting placement or erection of the foundations or structures supporting a transmission line. Construction does not include preconstruction activity or the addition of circuits to an existing transmission line. (e) "Electric utility" means a person, partnership, corporation, association, or other legal entity whose transmission or distribution of electricity the commission regulates under 1909 PA 106, MCL 460.551 to 460.559, or 1939 PA 3, MCL 460.1 to 460.10cc. 460.11. Electric utility does not include a municipal utility, affiliated transmission company, or independent transmission company. (f) "Independent transmission company" means a person, partnership, corporation, association, or other legal entity, or its successors or assigns, that has fully satisfied the requirements to join a regional transmission organization, that is engaged in this state or proposes to be engaged in the transmission of electricity using facilities it owns, that have been divested to the entity by an electric utility that was engaged in the generation, transmission, and distribution of electricity in this state on December 31, 2000, and that is independent of an electric utility or not an affiliate of the an electric utility , generating or distributing electricity to retail customers in this state. (g) "Major transmission line" means a transmission line of 5 miles or more in length wholly or partially owned by an electric utility, affiliated transmission company, or independent transmission company through which electricity is transferred at system bulk supply voltage of 345 kilovolts or more. (h) "Municipality" means a city, township, or village. (i) "Preconstruction activity" means any activity on a proposed route conducted before construction of a transmission line begins. Preconstruction activity includes surveys, measurements, examinations, soundings, borings, sample-taking, or other testing procedures, photography, appraisal, or tests of soil, groundwater, structures, or other materials in or on the real property for contamination. Preconstruction activity does not include an action that permanently or irreparably alters the real property on or across the proposed route. (j) "Route" means real property on or across which a transmission line is constructed or proposed to be constructed. (k) "Transmission line" means all structures, equipment, and real property necessary to transfer electricity at system bulk supply voltage of 100 kilovolts or more. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are enacted into law. (a) House Bill No. 5538 (request no. H01720'25). (b) House Bill No. 5539 (request no. H02281'25).